Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.150

Commission authority—Violations of chapter—Imposition of penalties.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5627-S.SL) ***

(1) The commission may investigate and enforce violations of RCW 19.122.055, 19.122.075, and 19.122.090 relating to pipeline facilities without initial referral to the safety committee created under RCW 19.122.130.

(2) If the commission's investigation of notifications received pursuant to RCW 19.122.140 or subsection (1) of this section substantiates violations of this chapter, the commission may impose penalties authorized by RCW 19.122.055, 19.122.070, 19.122.075, and 19.122.090, and require training, education, or any combination thereof.

(3) With respect to referrals from the safety committee, the commission must consider any recommendation by the committee regarding enforcement and remedial actions involving an alleged violator.

(4) In an action to impose a penalty initiated by the commission under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the penalty is due and payable when the person incurring the penalty receives a notice of penalty in writing from the commission describing the violation and advising the person that the penalty is due. The person incurring the penalty has fifteen days from the date the person receives the notice of penalty to file with the commission a request for mitigation or a request for a hearing. The commission must include this time limit information in the notice of penalty. After receiving a timely request for mitigation or hearing, the commission must suspend collection of the penalty until it issues a final order concerning the penalty or mitigation of that penalty. A person aggrieved by the commission's final order may seek judicial review, subject to provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(5) If a penalty imposed by the commission is not paid, the attorney general may, on the commission's behalf, file a civil action in superior court to collect the penalty.

[ 2017 c 20 s 3; 2011 c 263 s 21.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.